Utah statutes.
76-10-1903.   Money laundering.

(1)  A person commits the offense of money laundering who:

(a)  transports, receives, or acquires the property which is in fact proceeds of the specified unlawful activity, knowing that the property involved represents the proceeds of some form of unlawful activity;

(b)  makes proceeds of unlawful activity available to another by transaction, transportation, or other means, knowing that the proceeds are intended to be used for the purpose of continuing or furthering the commission of specified unlawful activity;

(c)  conducts a transaction knowing the property involved in the transaction represents the proceeds of some form of unlawful activity with the intent:

(i)  to promote the unlawful activity;

(ii)  to conceal or disguise the nature, location, source, ownership, or control of the property; or

(iii)  to avoid a transaction reporting requirement under this chapter or under federal law; or

(d)  knowingly accepts or receives property which is represented to be proceeds of unlawful activity.

(2)  Under Subsection (1)(d), knowledge that the property represents the proceeds of unlawful activity may be established by proof that a law enforcement officer or an individual acting at the request of a law enforcement officer made the representations and the person's subsequent statements or actions indicate that the person believed those representations to be true.



Amended by Chapter 74, 2009 General Session

